src/morphology/hacks/tagger-hacks.lexc
[WORD_ID=liukastumattomiksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:0liukastumattomiksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=liukukäytäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0liukukäytäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=liuotinpohjaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0liuotinpohjaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=liuotinpohjaisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0liuotinpohjaisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=liuottavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0liuottavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=liuottavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0liuottavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=liuottavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0liuottavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lohista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0lohista	#	;
[WORD_ID=loisperäiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0loisperäiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=lokalisoivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lokalisoivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopetettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lopetettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopetettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lopetettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopettavaan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0lopettavaan	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopettavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lopettavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lopettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lopettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lopettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0lopettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=loppukäsittelytoimista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0loppukäsittelytoimista	#	;
[WORD_ID=loppupisteistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0loppupisteistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=louhittavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0louhittavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=louhivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0louhivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=louhivilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0louhivilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=lueteltavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lueteltavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lueteltavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lueteltavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lueteltaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0lueteltaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lueteltavilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lueteltavilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=lueteltaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0lueteltaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=lueteltavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0lueteltavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luettelemattomien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luettelemattomien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luettelemattomista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0luettelemattomista	#	;
[WORD_ID=lujemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0lujemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lujittavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lujittavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukeutuvia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lukeutuvia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukeutuvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lukeutuvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lukittavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lukittavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0lukittaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittavilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lukittavilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0lukittavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittuvia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lukittuvia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittuvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lukittuvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukittuvilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lukittuvilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukkiutuvia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lukkiutuvia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukkiutuvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lukkiutuvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukkiutuvilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lukkiutuvilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=lukkiutuvissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0lukkiutuvissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=-lukuinen][POS=ADJECTIVE][COMPOUND_FORM=S][COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:0-lukuinen	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokiteltavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luokiteltavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokiteltavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luokiteltavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokiteltaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0luokiteltaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokiteltavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0luokiteltavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokiteltavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0luokiteltavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=-luokittelematon][POS=ADJECTIVE][COMPOUND_FORM=S][COMPOUND_FORM=OMIT]:0-luokittelematon	#	;
[WORD_ID=-luokkaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0-luokkaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=-luokkaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0-luokkaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0luokkakohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaisena][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:0luokkakohtaisena	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaisen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0luokkakohtaisen	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaisessa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0luokkakohtaisessa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0luokkakohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luokkakohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaisissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0luokkakohtaisissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokkakohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luokkakohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokseen][POS=ADVERB][POSS=3]:0luokseen	#	;
[WORD_ID=luokse][POS=ADVERB]:0luokse	#	;
[WORD_ID=luonnehdittavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0luonnehdittavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=luonnehtivia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luonnehtivia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luonnehtivien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luonnehtivien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luonnehtivista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0luonnehtivista	#	;
[WORD_ID=luonnontieteisiin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0luonnontieteisiin	#	;
[WORD_ID=luonnonvarakohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0luonnonvarakohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=luo][POS=ADVERB]:0luo	#	;
[WORD_ID=luopuvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luopuvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luopuvilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0luopuvilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaavaa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0luotaavaa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaavan][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0luotaavan	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaava][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0luotaava	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaavassa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0luotaavassa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0luotaavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luotaavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luotaavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luotavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luotavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0luotaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotavissa][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0luotavissa	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0luotavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotonantajakohtaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luotonantajakohtaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luotsaavat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0luotsaavat	#	;
[WORD_ID=luovutettavia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0luovutettavia	#	;
[WORD_ID=luovutettavien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0luovutettavien	#	;
[WORD_ID=luovutettaviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0luovutettaviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=luovutettaville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0luovutettaville	#	;
[WORD_ID=luovutettavista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0luovutettavista	#	;
[WORD_ID=lupakohtaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lupakohtaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=lupakohtaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lupakohtaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=lupautuvat][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lupautuvat	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyhentävän][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0lyhentävän	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyhentävä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0lyhentävä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyhentävät][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lyhentävät	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyhyistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0lyhyistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijykehysteiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lyijykehysteiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijyperustaiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lyijyperustaiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijypohjaisella][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0lyijypohjaisella	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijypohjaisia][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lyijypohjaisia	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijypohjaisilla][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lyijypohjaisilla	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijypohjaista][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0lyijypohjaista	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijypohjaisten][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lyijypohjaisten	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyijypäiset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lyijypäiset	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkääviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lykkääviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävällä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0lykkäävällä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävän][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0lykkäävän	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0lykkäävä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävästä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0lykkäävästä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävät][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lykkäävät	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävään][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0lykkäävään	#	;
[WORD_ID=lykkäävää][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0lykkäävää	#	;
[WORD_ID=lypsävillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lypsävillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lypsävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0lypsävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lyövät][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lyövät	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähdekieliset][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lähdekieliset	#	;
[WORD_ID=läheisemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=CMP]:0läheisemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=läheisilleen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL][POSS=3]:0läheisilleen	#	;
[WORD_ID=läheisimmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][POS=ADVERB][CMP=SUP]:0läheisimmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähemmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=CMP][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:0lähemmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähemmän][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=CMP][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0lähemmän	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähempi][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=CMP][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0lähempi	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähempiä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=CMP][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lähempiä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähempää][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=CMP][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:0lähempää	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähentyvien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lähentyvien	#	;
[WORD_ID=läheskään][POS=ADVERB][CLIT=KAAN]:0läheskään	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähes][POS=ADVERB]:0lähes	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lähetettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettäviin][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ILL]:0lähetettäviin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0lähetettäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettävillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lähetettävillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettäviltä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0lähetettäviltä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettävissä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0lähetettävissä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0lähetettävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetettäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lähetettäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettävien][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:0lähettävien	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettäville][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0lähettäville	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettävillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lähettävillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettäviltä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:0lähettäviltä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettävissä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:0lähettävissä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettävistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0lähettävistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettäviä][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:0lähettäviä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähettävään][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:0lähettävään	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähetyskohtainen][POS=ADJECTIVE][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:0lähetyskohtainen	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmille][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:0lähimmille	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmillä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:0lähimmillä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmillään][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE][POSS=3]:0lähimmillään	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmin][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=PL][CASE=INS]:0lähimmin	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmistä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:0lähimmistä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmäksi][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:0lähimmäksi	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmälle][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:0lähimmälle	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmällä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:0lähimmällä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmältä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:0lähimmältä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmän][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:0lähimmän	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmässä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:0lähimmässä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmästä][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:0lähimmästä	#	;
[WORD_ID=lähimmät][POS=ADJECTIVE][CMP=SUP][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:0lähimmät	#	;
